inc/verbs.lexc
 Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@hum.uit.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!! Plains Cree verb morphology                  
! ========================================================================== !




!! The Plains Cree verbs are divided in four groups:

!! # AI: Animate intransitive 
!! # II: Inanimate intransitive
!! # TA: Transitive animate
!! # TI: Transitive inanimate



!! !!!Prefixes


LEXICON VerbPrefixes  !!= @CODE@ divides the lexicon into four modes: independent, conjunctive, imperative and future conditional

@U.order.indep@ INDEPENDENT ;         !!= * @CODE@
@U.order.cnj@   CONJUNCT ;            !!= * @CODE@ 
                IMPERATIVE ;          !!= * @CODE@
                FUTURE_CONDITIONAL ;  !!= * @CODE@


LEXICON INDEPENDENT !!= @CODE@ gives flags and prefixes for personprefix
@U.person.NI@:@U.person.NI@nit2%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@:@U.person.KI@kit2%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@                   IND_TENSE ;


LEXICON IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ gives flags and prefixes for tense 
@U.tense.Prs@                                                             VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.Prt@@P.joiner.NULL@:@U.tense.Prt@@P.joiner.NULL@kî^EGLOT%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.Prt@@P.joiner.hyphen@:@U.tense.Prt@@P.joiner.hyphen@kî-%<        VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutDef@@P.joiner.NULL@:@U.tense.FutDef@@P.joiner.NULL@ka^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutDef@@P.joiner.hyphen@:@U.tense.FutDef@@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutInt@@P.joiner.NULL@:@U.tense.FutInt@@P.joiner.NULL@wî^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutInt@@P.joiner.hyphen@:@U.tense.FutInt@@P.joiner.hyphen@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;


LEXICON FUTURE_CONDITIONAL !!= @CODE@ gives flags for future conditional (no prefix)
@U.order.FutCon@ VERBPREFIXES ;


LEXICON CONJUNCT !!= @CODE@ gives flag for conjunct and prefix ê-, kâ-, kâki-
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/e+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ê-%<          CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/e+:@P.joiner.NULL@ê^EGLOT%<         CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-%<        CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.NULL@ka^EGLOT%<       CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kaa+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kâ-%<       CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kaa+:@P.joiner.NULL@kâ^EGLOT%<      CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kaa_ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kâ-ki-%< CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kaa_ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@kâki^EGLOT%< CNJ_TENSE ;

@P.cnj.CC@ CNJ_TENSE ; ! Option to allow for the occasional omission of the grammatical conjunct prefix


LEXICON CNJ_TENSE   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for tense in conjunct
@U.tense.Prs@                                                                           VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@kî-%<        VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.tense.Prt@@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@kî^EGLOT%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.tense.FutInt@@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@wî^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;


LEXICON IMPERATIVE   !!= @CODE@ gives flag for imperative (no prefixes)
@U.order.imp@  VERBPREFIXES ;

!! Words marked GG are from Plains Cree Grammar guide and glossary


!! !! Preverbs
!     ==========

LEXICON VERBPREFIXES  !!= @CODE@ just adds the prefix boundary
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
REDUPLICATION ;
PREVERBS ;

LEXICON REDUPLICATION
RdplW+:%^DUPL1ay2 REDUPL_BOUND ;
RdplS+:%^DUPL1âh  REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@%^DUPL2ay3%^DUPL1âh      REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@%^DUPL2ay3-%^DUPL1âh REDUPL_BOUND ;

LEXICON REDUPL_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@-%< REDUPL_CONT ;

LEXICON REDUPL_CONT
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
PREVERBS ;

LEXICON PREVERBS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@C.cnj@%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@C.cnj@-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;



LEXICON WICI
@U.joiner.NULL@:@U.joiner.NULL@wîci%^EGLOT%<      VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph
@U.joiner.hyphen@:@U.joiner.hyphen@wîci-%<        VERBSTEMS ; !!!! We need to deal with the wît- allomorph

LEXICON VERBSTEMS
!!!HAVE YAMLS FOR THESE !!!
osâwâw:osâwâ VII-1 ;
mihkwâw:mihkwâ VII-1 ;
nîpin3 VII-2 ;
mispon VII-2 ;
pimamon VII-2 ;
mâyâtan VII-2 ;

apiw:api VAI-1 ;
atoskêw:atoskê VAI-1 ;
matow:mato VAI-1 ;
mîcisow:mîciso VAI-1 ;
nêhiyawêw:nêhiyawê VAI-1 ;
nipâw:nipâ VAI-1 ;
pimisin VAI-1 ;

kâtâw:kâtâ VTI-1 ;
mîciw:mîci VTI-1 ;
wâpahtam:wâpaht4a VTI-2 ; ! Check status of -a

kîskiswêw:kîskisw VTA-1;  ! w:0 for collapsing cases
atoskahêw:atoskah VTA-1 ;
miskawêw:miskaw VTA-1 ;
mowêw:mow2 VTA-1 ;        ! w2:w for non-collapsing cases
nâtêw:nât3 VTA-1 ;        ! t3:s in some cases
wâpamêw:wâpam VTA-1 ;
wîcihêw:wîcih VTA-1 ;

!!! NO YAML !!!
itêw:it3 VTA-2 ;
kostêw:kost3 VTA-1 ;      ! s:0 when preceeding t3:s
ayâwêw:ayâw2 VTA-1 ;      ! w2:w for non-collapsing cases
nitonawêw:nitonaw VTA-1;  ! w:0, V:VV for VG rules




!! wâpiskâw:wâpiskâ VII-1 ;
!! ayâw:ayâ VII-1 ;
!! mispon:mispon3 VII-2 ;
!! acimow:acimo VAI-1 ;
!! nipâw:nipâ VAI-1 ;
!! itwêw:itwê VAI-1 ;
!! wâpahtam:wâpaht4 VTI-1 ;
!! itam:it VTI-1 ;
!! mowêw:mow2 VTA-1 ;
!! acimêw:acim VTA-1 ;
!! itêw:it3 VTA-2 ;


!! Now, lexc directs us to the ../stems/verbs.lexc file,
!! where we find all the verbal stems. The suffixes are then
!! found in the section "Suffixes" right underneath.

! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================

!! !!!Suffixes

!! fst:
!! AICONJ:  stem
!! AICONJw: stem (excl w)
! 
!! Wolv:
!! AICONJ_n
!! AICONJ_w

! Auxiliary lexica for the verb dump

! LEXICON AICONJ_n 
! VAI-2 ;
! LEXICON AICONJ_v 
! VAI-1 ;


!! LEXICON TACONJ_3 
!! TACONJ_2 ;
!! 
!! LEXICON TACONJ_4 
!! TACONJ_2 ;

! LEXICON TICONJi  ! Trond dymmy delete
! # ;


!! !!! Intransitive inanimate (II)
!      ===========================
!      ===========================

!!! STEM CLASS

LEXICON VII-1_SGPL !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VII-1_SGPL_WICI ;

LEXICON VII-1_SG !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VII-1_SG_WICI ;

LEXICON VII-2_PL !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VII-2_PL_WICI ;

!! LEXICON VIIw_PL !!= @CODE@  NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
!! +V+II: VIIw_PL_WICI ;	   NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

LEXICON VII-2_SGPL !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VII-2_SGPL_WICI ;

LEXICON VII-2_SG !!= @CODE@  
+V+II:  VII-2_SGPL_WICI ;

!! LEXICON VIIn_PL !!= @CODE@  NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
!! +V+II: VIIn_PL_WICI ;	   NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

!!! WICI 
!!!NOTE: II do not take this morpheme, so all forms should be null flagged.

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON PREVERBS
PV/akawaci+:akâwâci PREVERBS_BOUND "wishfully" ; ! Manner
PV/akoci+:akoci PREVERBS_BOUND "hanging" ; ! Position
PV/apisci+:apisci PREVERBS_BOUND "small, little" ; ! Size
PV/apisisi+:apisîsi PREVERBS_BOUND "small" ; ! Size
PV/aseya+:asêya PREVERBS_BOUND "in a group" ; 
PV/atimi+:atimi PREVERBS_BOUND "going away from speaker, towards addressee" ; 
PV/ayamihewi+:ayamihêwi PREVERBS_BOUND "of the Christian religion, of church" ; 
PV/ayi+:ayi PREVERBS_BOUND "ah, hm" ; 
PV/ahkami+:âhkami PREVERBS_BOUND "persistently, untiringly, unfailingly, unceasingly, unwaveringly; keep on, persevere" ; 
PV/akwa+:âkwâ PREVERBS_BOUND "quite a lot; well on its way, in progress of time" ; 
PV/aniski+:âniski PREVERBS_BOUND "succession, extension" ; 
PV/apihtawi+:âpihtawi PREVERBS_BOUND "half" ; 
PV/asowi+:âsowi PREVERBS_BOUND "in turn, in succession" ; 
PV/cipehtako+:cîpêhtako PREVERBS_BOUND "blue, greyish blue, grey" ; 
PV/ispihci+:ispîhci PREVERBS_BOUND "meanwhile, beforehand" ; 
PV/kakwahyaki+:kakwâhyaki PREVERBS_BOUND "greatly, extremely, overwhelmingly; with startled surprise" ; 
PV/kanaci+:kanâci PREVERBS_BOUND "clean" ; 
PV/kayasi+:kayâsi PREVERBS_BOUND "old" ; 
PV/kawi+:kâwi PREVERBS_BOUND "again; back, in return" ; 
PV/ketiski+:kêtiski PREVERBS_BOUND "to exact measure" ; 
PV/kipi+:kipi PREVERBS_BOUND "blocking" ; 
PV/kisiska+:kisiskâ PREVERBS_BOUND "fast, quickly" ; 
PV/kitimaki+:kitimâki PREVERBS_BOUND "pitiable, pitiably" ; 
PV/kipi+:kîpi PREVERBS_BOUND "quickly" ; 
PV/kiwaci+:kîwâci PREVERBS_BOUND "orphaned, stray; lonely, desolately" ; 
PV/kotate+:kôtatê PREVERBS_BOUND "at a loss, making no attempt" ; 
PV/kwayasko+:kwayasko PREVERBS_BOUND "straight; properly, correctly" ; 
PV/kwataki+:kwâtaki PREVERBS_BOUND "distressing, tormenting, tortuous" ; 
PV/maci+:maci PREVERBS_BOUND "bad, evil, wicked, wrong, ill" ; 
PV/masta+:mastâ PREVERBS_BOUND "later" ; 
PV/mamawi+:mâmawi PREVERBS_BOUND "together; in full number of them all, altogether, all together as a group" ; 
PV/mayi+:mâyi PREVERBS_BOUND "bad, evil; badly, evilly, wickedly" ; 
PV/mesti+:mêsti PREVERBS_BOUND "it is used up, it is burnt out, it is spent" ; 
PV/misi+:misi PREVERBS_BOUND "big, greatly; much, a lot; very, extremely, to the extreme" ; 
PV/mohco+:môhco PREVERBS_BOUND "silly, crazy" ; 
PV/naki+:naki PREVERBS_BOUND "stopping" ; 
PV/nawaci+:nawaci PREVERBS_BOUND "better" ; 
PV/nawayawi+:nâwayawi PREVERBS_BOUND "one behind the other, in a row" ; 
PV/nisihkaci+:nisîhkâci PREVERBS_BOUND "gently, carefully, slowly" ; 
PV/nikani+:nîkâni PREVERBS_BOUND "in front, ahead, at the head, in the future" ; 
PV/nohte+:nôhtê PREVERBS_BOUND "want to, desire to; lack" ; 
PV/osami+:osâmi PREVERBS_BOUND "too much, because of excess, for" ; 
PV/otami+:otami PREVERBS_BOUND "busy, occupied, delayed" ; 
PV/pahki+:pahki PREVERBS_BOUND "portion of" ; 
PV/papasi+:papâsi PREVERBS_BOUND "fast, in a hurry, quick" ; 
PV/pahko+:pâhko PREVERBS_BOUND "dry" ; 
PV/peyako+:pêyako PREVERBS_BOUND "alone, only; as one" ; 
PV/pisci+:pisci PREVERBS_BOUND "accidentally, mistakenly, erroneously" ; 
PV/pikiskaci+:pîkiskâci PREVERBS_BOUND "sorry, sad, lonely" ; 
PV/poni+:pôni PREVERBS_BOUND "stop, terminate, cease; after" ; 
PV/saskaci+:saskaci PREVERBS_BOUND "weary, tired of" ; 
PV/sasakici+:sâsakici PREVERBS_BOUND "backwards; supine" ; 
PV/simaci+:simaci PREVERBS_BOUND "upright; straightened" ; 
PV/sikawi+:sîkawi PREVERBS_BOUND "pouring, flooding" ; 
PV/ta+:ta PREVERBS_BOUND "[grammatical preverb: future; infinitive]" ; 
PV/tahto+:tahto PREVERBS_BOUND "as many as" ; 
PV/tah+:tâh PREVERBS_BOUND "would, ought to; likely to" ; 
PV/tehci+:têhci PREVERBS_BOUND "on, on top of something" ; 
PV/tipi+:tipi PREVERBS_BOUND "equal" ; 
PV/wani+:wani PREVERBS_BOUND "dim, dark, indistinctly, blurred; lose; destroy" ; 
PV/wah+:wâh PREVERBS_BOUND "whenever in future" ; 
PV/wasa+:wâsâ PREVERBS_BOUND "around" ; 
PV/wiyipi+:wiyîpi PREVERBS_BOUND "dirty looking; dull brown, drab" ; 
PV/wipo+:wîpo PREVERBS_BOUND "narrow" ; 
PV/yikate+:yîkatê PREVERBS_BOUND "aside" ; 
